Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 11.7 STANDARDIZED TREATMENT PROGRAM FOR SEX OFFENDERS
16-11.7-106. Sex offender evaluation, treatment, and polygraph services - contracts with providers - placement on provider list - grievances - fund created.

The department of corrections, the judicial department, the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, or the department of human services shall not employ or contract with, and shall not allow an adult sex offender or a juvenile who has committed a sexual offense to employ or contract with, an individual or entity to provide sex-offender-specific evaluation, treatment, or polygraph services pursuant to this article unless the sex-offender-specific evaluation, treatment, or polygraph services to be provided by the individual or entity conform with the guidelines and standards developed pursuant to section 16-11.7-103, and the name of the individual providing services is on the list created pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section of persons who may provide sex-offender-specific services.

The board shall develop an application and review process for treatment providers, evaluators, and polygraph examiners who provide services pursuant to this article to adult sex offenders and to juveniles who have committed sexual offenses. The application and review process shall allow providers to demonstrate that they are in compliance with the standards adopted pursuant to this article. The application and review process shall consist of the following three parts:

The board shall develop separate application and review processes for standards that apply to the criminal justice component, such as criminal history record checks, for evaluators, individual treatment providers, and polygraph examiners. Applications for the criminal justice components, including fingerprints, shall be submitted to the board. The board shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for use in conducting a state criminal history record check and for transmittal to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history record check. The board may use information obtained from the state and national criminal history record checks to determine an applicant's eligibility for placement on the approved provider list. The board shall be responsible for the implementation of the provisions of this subparagraph (I).

The board shall develop an application and review process for the verification of the qualifications and credentials of evaluators, treatment providers, and polygraph examiners.

The board shall require a person who applies for placement, including a person who applies for continued placement, on the list of persons who may provide sex-offender-specific evaluation, treatment, and polygraph services pursuant to this article to submit to a current background investigation that goes beyond the scope of the criminal history record check described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a). In conducting the current background investigation required by this subparagraph (III), the board shall obtain reference and criminal history information and recommendations that may be relevant to the applicant's fitness to provide sex-offender-specific evaluation, treatment, and polygraph services pursuant to this article.

After the process developed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is established and providers have met all the criteria of the application and review process, the board may approve the provider. The board and the department of regulatory agencies shall jointly publish at least annually a list of approved providers. The board shall forward the list to the office of the state court administrator, the department of public safety, the department of human services, and the department of corrections. The board shall update and forward the list of approved providers as necessary.

The board shall use the information obtained from the state and national criminal history record checks and the current background investigation in determining whether to place or continue the placement of a person on the approved provider list.

The board may determine the requirements for an evaluator's, treatment provider's, or polygraph examiner's name to be placed on the approved provider list after his or her name has been removed from the list for any reason.

The board shall develop a renewal process for the continued placement of a person on the approved provider list published pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

The board may assess a fee to an applicant for placement on the approved provider list. The fee shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars per application to cover the costs of conducting a current background investigation required by subsection (2) of this section. All moneys collected pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the sex offender treatment provider fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this subsection (6) as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly to the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety for the direct and indirect costs associated with the current background investigation required by subsection (2) of this section. Any moneys in the fund not expended for the purpose of subsection (2) of this section may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.

The board shall notify the department of regulatory agencies of the receipt of any complaints or grievances against an individual who provides sex-offender-specific treatment or evaluation services pursuant to this article 11.7 and advise the department of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to subsection (7)(b) of this section. The department of regulatory agencies or the appropriate board, pursuant to article 245 of title 12 and referred to in this subsection (7) as the "DORA board", shall notify the board of the receipt of any complaint or grievance against a provider who provides sex-offender-specific treatment or evaluation services pursuant to this article 11.7, if the complaint or grievance was not referred by the board, and advise the board of any disciplinary action taken against the individual pursuant to any professional licensing act.

The board shall review and investigate all complaints and grievances concerning compliance with its standards against individuals who provide sex-offender-specific treatment, evaluation, or polygraph services pursuant to this article. Notwithstanding any action taken by the department of regulatory agencies or the DORA board, the board may take appropriate disciplinary action, as permitted by law, against an individual who provides sex-offender-specific treatment, evaluation, or polygraph services pursuant to this article. The disciplinary action may include, but need not be limited to, the removal of the individual's name from the list of persons who may provide sex offender evaluation, treatment, or polygraph services pursuant to this article.

Nothing in this subsection (7) limits the rights or responsibilities of the department of regulatory agencies or the DORA board with respect to the investigation and resolution of complaints pursuant to article 245 of title 12.

Nothing in this subsection (7) limits the rights or responsibilities of the board with respect to the addition or removal of an individual's name from the list of persons who may provide sex offender evaluation, treatment, or polygraph services pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 461, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2652, § 127, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 468, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1151, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 926, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 813, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 11-1138), ch. 236, p. 1023, § 6, effective May 27.

L. 2016:

(7) R&RE, (HB 16-1345), ch. 347, p. 1416, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(7)(a) and (7)(c)(I) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1672, § 85, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

16-11.7-107. Report to the general assembly. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article added, p. 461, § 3, effective June 2.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 466, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 726, § 4, effective May 18.

16-11.7-108. Operation and construction of juvenile sex offender treatment facilities and new treatment modalities - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 51, § 1, effective March 11.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2002. (See L. 2001, p. 51.)

16-11.7-109. Reporting requirements - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

As a body, the board is one of Colorado's most important resources on the treatment and management of adult sex offenders and juveniles who have committed sexual offenses;

The board's research and analysis of treatment standards and programs, as well as empirical evidence collected and compiled by the board with respect to the treatment outcomes of adult sex offenders and juveniles who have committed sexual offenses, is vital to inform the decisions of policymakers.

The general assembly therefore finds that it is appropriate for the board to report to the general assembly on an annual basis concerning the status of the treatment and management of adult sex offenders and juveniles who have committed sexual offenses in Colorado.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before January 31, 2012, and on or before January 31 each year thereafter, the board shall prepare and present to the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, a written report concerning best practices for the treatment and management of adult sex offenders and juveniles who have committed sexual offenses, including any evidence-based analysis of treatment standards and programs as well as information concerning any new federal legislation relating to the treatment and management of adult sex offenders and juveniles who have committed sexual offenses. The report may include the board's recommendations for legislation to carry out the purpose and duties of the board to protect the community.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1138), ch. 236, p. 1026, § 7, effective May 27.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1059), ch. 91, p. 277, § 1, effective August 9.